src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
| Tag | POS transition | Comment |
|:--- |:--------------:|:------- |
| `+Der` |   n/a   | generic derivation tag used in front of all non-positional derivations.
| `+Der/veara` | NA#     |
| `+Der/viđá` | NA#     |
| `+Der/viđi` | NA#     |
| `+Der/has` | ?       | only one in the code

## Miscellanious list
See lexicons NAMAT and SAS for these:

* **+Der/A** = Adjective derivated from Noun or Verb
* **+Der/Adv** = Adverb derivated from Adjective

# Tags for originating language

The following tags are used to guide conversion to IPA: loan words
and foreign names are usually pronounced (approximately) as in the
originating (majority) language. Instead of trying to identify the
correct pronunciation based on phonotactics (orthotactics actually),
we tag all words that can't be correctly transcribed using the SME
transcriber with source language codes. Once tagged, it is possible
to split the lexical transducer in smaller ones according to langu-
age, and apply different IPA conversion to each of them.
The principle of tagging is that we only tag to the extent needed,
and following a priority:
1. any untagged word is pronounced with SME orthographic conventions
1. NNO and NOB have identical pronunciation, NNO is only used if
different in spelling from NOB
1. SWE has mostly the same pronunciation as NOB, and is only used
if different in spelling from NOB
1. Occasionally even SME (the default) may be tagged, to block other
languages from being specified, mainly during semi-automatic
language tagging sessions
All in all, we want to get as much correctly transcribed to IPA
with as little work as possible. On the other hand, if more words
are tagged than strictly needed, this should pose no problem as
long as the IPA conversion is correct - at least some words will
get the same pronunciation whether read as SME or NOB/NNO/SWE.

* **+OLang/SME** = North Sámi
* **+OLang/SMJ** = Lule Sámi
* **+OLang/SMA** = South Sámi
* **+OLang/FIN** = Finnish
* **+OLang/SWE** = Swedish
* **+OLang/NOB** = Norw. bokmål
* **+OLang/NNO** = Norw. nynorsk
* **+OLang/ENG** = English
* **+OLang/HUN** = Hungarian
* **+OLang/RUS** = Russian
* **+OLang/UND** = Undefined
* **+OLang/PARA** = parallelle navn, navnet skal ikke overføres til andre samisk språk

## Triggers for morphophonological rules

* **X1** = Diphthong Simplification, Metaphony
* **X2** = Diphthong Simplification, Metaphony, Word Final Neutralization of g8, h8, m8
* **X3** = Diphthong Simplification, Metaphony
* **X4** = WeG, Vowel Shortening, Stem vowel alternations, Word Final Deletion of n8 m8 g8 h8
* **X5** = WeG, Diphthong Simplification, Stem vowel alternations
* **X6** = WeG, Diphthong Simplification, Metaphony, Word Final Deletion of n8 m8 g8 h8
* **X7** = Vowel Shortening, Stem vowel alternations, Word Final Neutralization of g8, h8, m8
* **X8** = WeG, Vowel Shortening, Metaphony, Stem Vowel alternations, Word Final Deletion of n8 m8 g8 h8
* **X9** = WeG, Dipthtong simplification, Word Final Deletion of n8 m8 g8 h8
* **Y1** = Lengthening of Central Consonants, Stem Vowel alternations,
* **Y2** = Lengthening of Central Consonants, Stem Vowel alternations,
* **Y3** = Lengthening of Central Consonants, Stem Vowel alternations,
* **Y4** = Lengthening of Central Consonants, Stem Vowel alternations,
* **Y5** = Lengthening of Central Consonants, Word Final Consonant Deletion, Diphthong Simplification, Stem vowel alternations
* **Y6** = Lengthening of Central Consonants, Word Final Consonant Deletion, Diphthong Simplification, Stem vowel alternations
* **Y7** = Lengthening of Central Consonants, Diphthong Simplification, Stem vowel alternations
* **Y8** = Not in use
* **Y9** = Lengthening of Central Consonants, Diphthong Simplification
* **Q1** = Stem vowel alternations,
* **Q2** = Diphthong Simplification, Stem vowel alternations,
* **Q3** = Diphthong Simplification, Stem vowel alternations,
* **Q4** = WeG, Stem vowel alternations,
* **Q5** = WeG, Diphthong Simplification, Stem vowel alternations,
* **Q6** = WeG, Vowel shortening,
* **Q7** = WeG, Diphthong Simplification, Metaphony,
* **Q8** = WeG, Diphthong Simplification, Stem vowel alternations,
* **Q9** = Not in use
* **W1** = WeG, Vowel Shortening
* **W2** = Vowel Shortening,
* **W3** = Stem vowel deletion in compounding,
* **W4** = WeG, Word Final Cluster Simplification, Optional vowel-shortening, Word Final Deletion of n8 m8 g8 h8
* **W5** = WeG, Diphthong Simplification, Stem vowel alternations
* **W6** = Stem vowel alternations, WeG,
* **W7** = Stem vowel alternations, WeG
* **W8** = Stem vowel alternations,
* **W9** = Not in use
* **%^DISIMP** = diphthong simpification

## Morphophonemes and Sámi letters

* **b9** = twol rule override, so that b doesn't turn into t infront of hash
* **e7** = shortened i = "e with dot below" from the dictionary
* **e9** = twol rule override, so that e doesn't turn into i infront of j
* **d9** = twol rule override, so that d doesn't turn into t infront of hash
* **g8** = Word Final Neutralization and Deletion
* **g9** = twol rule override, so that g doesn't turn into t infront of hash
* **h7** =
* **h8** = Word Final Neutralization and Deletion
* **h9** = twol rule override, so that h doesn't turn into t infront of hash
* **i7** = twol rule override, so that i doesn't turn into e in certain contextes
* **j9** = twol rule override, so that j doesn't turn into i after i
* **k9** = twol rule override, so that k doesn't turn into t infront of hash
* **m8** = Word Final Neutralization and Deletion
* **m9** = twol rule override, so that m doesn't turn into n infront of hash
* **n8** = Word Final Neutralization and Deletion
* **n9** = twol rule override,
* **o7** = shortened u = "o with dot below" from the dictionary
* **o9** = twol rule override,  so that o doesn't turn into u infront of j
* **p9** = twol rule override, so that p doesn't turn into t infront of hash
* **s9** = twol rule override, so that we can have two ss in front of hash
* **t9** = twol rule override, so that we can have st in front of hash
* **u7** =
* **z9** = twol rule override, to avoid Word Final Consonant Neutralization
* **ž9** = twol rule override, to avoid Word Final Consonant Neutralization
* **š9** = twol rule override, so that we can have two šš in front of hash
* **r9** =
* **æ7** = in smi, for lulesámi
* **u6** = twol rule override, so that u doesn't turn into o in certain contextes
* **æ9** = in smi, for lulesámi

**∑** = a symbol used in front of `#` to block backtracking and
mwe reanalysis in hfst-tokenise (e.g. in dynanic compounds).
Makes it possible to distinguish lexical and dynamic compounds
in rules. It is converted to zero together with `#`.

## Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):

* »
* «
* > (escaped with square brackets, to avoid collision with > as morpheme boundary)
* < (escaped with square brackets, to avoid collision with < as morpheme boundary)
* #

# Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:

| Flag | Explanation
| ---- | -----------
|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @P.Vgen.add@ | (Dis)allow VGen
|  @R.Vgen.add@ | (Dis)allow VGen
|  @P.12p.add@ | (Dis)allow 1. and 2. pers forms
|  @R.12p.add@ | (Dis)allow 1. and 2. pers forms
|  @P.Pmatch.Loc@ | Used on multi-token analyses; tell hfst-tokenise/pmatch where in the form/analysis the token should be split.
|  @P.Pmatch.Backtrack@ | Used on single-token analyses; tell hfst-tokenise/pmatch to backtrack by reanalysing the substrings before and after this point in the form (to find combinations of shorter analyses that would otherwise be missed)

| Flag | Explanation
| ---- | -----------
|  @D.ErrOrth.ON@
|  @C.ErrOrth@
|  @P.ErrOrth.ON@
|  @R.ErrOrth.ON@

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.

| Flag | Explanation
| ---- | -----------
|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the two previous ones to block compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.
|  @D.CmpHyph.TRUE@ | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns
|  @U.CmpHyph.FALSE@ | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns
|  @U.CmpHyph.TRUE@ | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns
|  @C.CmpHyph@ | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.

| Flag | Explanation
| ---- | -----------
|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

* **@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@** is used to force hyphenation/non-reduction: samediggi-
* **@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@** is used to force reduction w/o hyphen: samedigge#xxx
* **@C.NeedsVowRed@** Clearing this feature, so that it doesn't interfere with further compounding

* @C.Px@
* @C.Nom3Px@
* @P.Px.add@
* @R.Px.add@
* @P.Px.block@
* @D.Px.block@
* @P.Nom12Px.add@
* @R.Nom12Px.add@
* @P.Nom3Px.add@
* @R.Nom3Px.add@

* **@R.SpellRlx.ON@** Flag used to tag spell-relax-analysed strings (and only those).
* **@D.SpellRlx.ON@** Flag used to tag spell-relax-analysed strings (and only those).
* **@C.SpellRlx@** Flag used to tag spell-relax-analysed strings (and only those).

* **@R.SpaceCmp.ON@** Flag to tag compounds written with a space
* **@D.SpaceCmp.ON@** Flag to tag compounds written with a space
* **@C.SpaceCmp@** Flag to tag compounds written with a space+
